North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-30 Dairy Products Regulations [Repealed]

4-30-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 86, § 1; 1985, ch. 100, § 1; 1989, ch. 87, §§ 1, 2; 1991, ch. 70, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 57, § 1; 2001, ch. 72, § 1; 2005, ch. 71, § 1; 2009, ch. 75, §
1; 2011, ch. 62, § 1; 2013, ch. 68, §§ 1, 2; 2015, ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-02.
Licenses required — Fees — Term. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 1; 1979, ch. 105, § 1; 1983, ch. 101, § 1; 1993, ch. 57, § 2; 2001, ch. 72, § 2; 2005, ch. 71, § 2; 2015, ch. 66, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-02.1.
Records release required with application for licensure. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 84, § 2; 1991, ch. 70, § 2; 2001, ch. 72, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-03.
Bonding of purchasers of dairy products. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 106, § 14.

4-30-03.1.
Financial condition — Assurance of prompt payment. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 106, § 1; 2001, ch. 72, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-03.2.
Statement of business operations or financial condition — Filing — Review by Bank of North Dakota — Confidential — Audited. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 106, § 2; 1991, ch. 70, § 3; 2001, ch. 72, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-03.3.
Surety bond, trustee agreement, other security or assurances. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 106, § 3; 1989, ch. 84, § 3; 2001, ch. 72, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-03.4.
Financial basis for license — Statement to producer — Notification to department. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 106, § 4; 2001, ch. 72, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-03.5.
Additional security. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 106, § 5; 2001, ch. 72, § 8; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-03.6.
Filing of security before license year. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 106, § 6; 2001, ch. 72, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-03.7.
Failure to file security — Notice to producers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 106, § 7; 2001, ch. 72, § 10; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-03.8.
Out-of-state dealers, processors, or producers not exempt. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 106, § 8; 1989, ch. 84, § 6; 2001, ch. 72, § 11; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-03.9.
Entry, inspection, and investigation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 84, § 4; 1993, ch. 57, § 3; 2001, ch. 55, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-03.10.
Records and reports. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 84, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-04.
Department to become trustee upon default in required security. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 3; 1979, ch. 106, § 10; 1985, ch. 82, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-05.
Application by department for appointment of trustee — Hearing — Appointment. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 4; 1979, ch. 107, § 1; 1993, ch. 57, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-06.
Notice to file claims — When claims barred. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 5; 1993, ch. 57, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-06.1.
Personal notice to file claims — When claims barred. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 57, § 35.

4-30-07.
Remedy of claimants — Separate action by claimant permissible. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 6; 1979, ch. 106, § 11; 1985, ch. 82, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-08.
Appeal or compromising of action by department. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 7; 1979, ch. 106, § 12; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-09.
Moneys collected on claims to be deposited in Bank of North Dakota. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 8; 1993, ch. 57, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-10.
Department to file report upon recovery of trust fund — Notice to claimants — Approving or modifying report. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 9; 1993, ch. 57, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-11.
Attorney general to represent department and may employ assistants — Department need not pay court costs. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 10; 1991, ch. 70, § 4; 1993, ch. 57, § 8; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-12.
License needed to sample, haul, or test — Training — Examination — Term — Fee. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 11; 1971, ch. 97, § 1; 1979, ch. 105, § 2; 1983, ch. 101, § 2; 1991, ch. 70, § 5; 1993, ch. 57, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-13.
Complaint upon violation — Notice of hearing. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 57, § 35.

4-30-13.1.
Commissioner to investigate complaint. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 57, § 10; 2001, ch. 72, § 12; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-13.2.
Inspections. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 57, § 32; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-14.
Hearing — Place. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 57, § 35.

4-30-15.
Suspension or revocation of license — Judicial review — Emergency order. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 14; 1979, ch. 106, § 13; 1991, ch. 70, § 6; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1993, ch. 57, § 11; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-16.
Witnesses — Subpoena. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 57, § 35.

4-30-17.
Review by the court. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 57, § 35.

4-30-18.
Sampling and testing procedures — Equipment — Supplies. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 17; 1975, ch. 60, § 1; 1979, ch. 105, § 7; 1983, ch. 103, § 2; 1991, ch. 70, § 8; 2001, ch. 72, § 13; 2005, ch. 71, § 3; 2007, ch. 64, § 1; 2009, ch. 75, §
2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-19.
Sampling cream — Care of samples. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 72, § 23.

4-30-20.
Sampling of milk. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 19; 1979, ch. 105, § 9; 1991, ch. 70, § 9; 2001, ch. 72, § 14; 2005, ch. 71, § 4; 2007, ch. 64, § 2; 2009, ch. 75, §
3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-21.
Standards for the production of cream for manufacturing purposes. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 72, § 23.

4-30-22.
Grades of cream and butterfat based on sediment content and quality. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 72, § 23.

4-30-23.
Sediment testing program for manufacturing cream. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 72, § 23.

4-30-24.
Acceptable, probational, and reject cream. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 72, § 23.

4-30-25.
Cream station requirements. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 72, § 23.

4-30-26.
Purchases of cream — Prices of grades to be kept posted. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 72, § 23.

4-30-27.
Standards for the production of manufacturing grade milk — Commissioner to adopt rules. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 26; 1979, ch. 105, § 10; 1993, ch. 57, § 14; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-28.
Farm certification. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 27; 1993, ch. 57, § 15; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-29.
Grades of milk for manufacturing purposes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 28; 1993, ch. 57, § 16; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-30.
Milk grading program. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 29; 1993, ch. 57, § 17; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-31.
Rejection and exclusion of milk. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 30; 1993, ch. 57, § 18; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-32.
New producers — Transfer producers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 31; 1993, ch. 57, § 19; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-33.
Standards for dairy manufacturing or processing — Commissioner to adopt rules. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 32; 1979, ch. 105, § 11; 1993, ch. 57, § 20; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-34.
Inspection of dairy plants manufacturing or processing milk products. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 33; 1993, ch. 57, § 21; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-35.
Standards for manufactured dairy products. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 34; 1993, ch. 57, § 22; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-36.
Standards for grade A milk and milk products — Adoption of amendments. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 35; 1973, ch. 60, § 2; 1979, ch. 105, § 12; 1981, ch. 98, § 1; 1983, ch. 102, § 1; 1985, ch. 101, § 1; 1991, ch. 70, § 13; 1993, ch. 57, § 23; 2001, ch. 72, § 15; 2003, ch. 60, § 2; 2005, ch. 71, § 5; 2007, ch. 64, § 3; 2009, ch. 75, §
4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-36.1.
Dairy commissioner — City health department — District health units — Cooperation in inspection. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 105, § 18.

4-30-36.2.
State milk sanitation rating and sampling surveillance officer — Duties — Guidelines. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 103, § 3; 1991, ch. 70, § 14; 2001, ch. 72, § 16; 2003, ch. 60, § 3; 2005, ch. 71, § 6; 2007, ch. 64, § 4; 2009, ch. 75, §
5; 2011, ch. 62, § 2; 2013, ch. 68, § 3; 2015, ch. 66, § 3, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, sb2026, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-36.3.
Milk laboratory evaluations officer — Duties — Guidelines. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 103, § 4; 1991, ch. 70, § 15; 2001, ch. 72, § 17; 2005, ch. 71, § 7; 2007, ch. 64, § 5; 2009, ch. 75, §
6; 2011, ch. 62, § 3; 2013, ch. 68, § 4; 2015, ch. 66, § 4, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, sb2026, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-36.4.
Grade A pasteurized milk ordinance. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 57, § 33; 2001, ch. 72, § 18; 2003, ch. 60, § 4; 2005, ch. 71, § 8; 2007, ch. 64, § 6; 2009, ch. 75, §
7; 2011, ch. 62, § 4; 2013, ch. 68, § 5; 2015, ch. 66, § 5, effective July 1, 2015; repealed by 2017, sb2026, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

Note.

Section 04-30-36.4 was amended 1 time and repealed by the 2017 Legislative Assembly.

Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is treated as repealed. Section 4 of Chapter 69, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1127; and section 13 of Chapter 61, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2026.

4-30-37.
Quality records to be kept — Term. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 36; 1991, ch. 70, § 16; 1993, ch. 57, § 24; 2001, ch. 72, § 19; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-38.
Transportation of milk for manufacturing, processing, or bottling purposes — Commissioner to adopt rules. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 37; 1979, ch. 105, § 13; 1993, ch. 57, § 25; 2001, ch. 72, § 20; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-38.1.
Milk haulers — License required — Commissioner to adopt rules. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 105, § 14; 1991, ch. 70, § 17; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-39.
Transportation, labeling, and distribution of processed and manufactured products — Rulemaking — Violations. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 38; 1979, ch. 105, § 15; 1993, ch. 57, § 26; 2009, ch. 75, §
8; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-40.
Adulterated, impure, or unwholesome milk or milk products not to be transported, stored, sold, or offered for sale. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 39; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-41.
Sale of milk or milk products in violation of this chapter prohibited. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 40; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-41.1.
Prohibition against sales of imitation milk or imitation milk products and filled dairy products. [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-41.2.
Exception for uses as directed by physicians. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 100, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-41.3.
Sale of foods not imitation milk, imitation milk products, or filled dairy products. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 100, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-41.4.
Shared animal ownership agreement — Raw milk. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 68, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-42.
Overrun limited. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2001, ch. 72, § 23.

4-30-43.
Filled dairy products — Declaration of policy. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 100, § 7.

4-30-44.
Branding cans, kegs, barrels, and receptacles — Filing brand — Contents. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 70, § 21.

4-30-45.
Labeling of milk and milk products for sale at retail. [Repealed]

Source:

Repealed by S.L. 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-45.1.
Labeling and identity standards. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 57, § 34; 2009, ch. 75, §
9; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-46.
Reports — Blanks — When made — Contents. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 45; 1967, ch. 78, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-47.
Dispute over test — Official test made — By whom — Other tests — Fees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 46; 1971, ch. 98, § 1; 1991, ch. 70, § 19; 2001, ch. 72, § 21; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-48.
Failure to agree on sample for official test — Procedure to be followed. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 47; 1993, ch. 57, § 28; 2001, ch. 72, § 22; 2003, ch. 48, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-49.
Standards considered minimum — Municipality may provide more stringent standards. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 48; 1993, ch. 57, § 29; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-50.
Fees and penalties collected to be placed in general fund. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 49; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-51.
Commissioner to investigate complaint. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 57, § 35.

4-30-52.
Disposal of illegal milk or milk products — Seizure. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 51; 1981, ch. 91, § 1; 1983, ch. 101, § 3; 1993, ch. 57, § 30; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-53.
Penalty for violation of chapter — Additional civil penalty — Failure to pay civil penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 52; 1975, ch. 106, § 26; 1983, ch. 101, § 4; 1985, ch. 100, § 5; 1993, ch. 57, § 31; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-54.
State’s attorney’s endorsement to complaint unnecessary upon violation of chapter. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 53; 1981, ch. 320, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-55.
Sale of raw milk for direct consumer consumption. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1985, ch. 100, § 7.

4-30-55.1.
Rules for enforcement of chapter. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 106, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-55.2.
Commissioner — Rulemaking authority — Limitation. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 68, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-30-56.
Enforcement. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 87, § 55; 1979, ch. 105, § 17; 1985, ch. 100, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.